apertium-nno.nno.dix
<pardef n="l/e__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>east</l>  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ett</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/e_no-cp__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eande</l> <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>east</l>  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ett</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/jå__vblex_adj" c="sett/sette">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jåande</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>jå</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jå</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jåast</l>     <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj" c="sett/sette">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ette</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jåande</l>	<r>jå<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>jå</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jå</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jåast</l>     <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åg</l>        <r>jå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="no-cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="r/ysje__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ust</l>   <r>ysje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ust</l>   <r>ysje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uste</l>  <r>ysje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uste</l>  <r>ysje<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysjande</l><r>ysje<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>    <r>ysje<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysj</l><r>ysje</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ysjast</l><r>ysje<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ust</l>   <r>ysje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>    <r>ysje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uste</l>  <r>ysje<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="sjå">             <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortsjå">             <i>borts</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="le">              <i>l</i><par n="l/e_no-cp__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gaple"><i>gapl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hikstele"><i>hikstel</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hånle"><i>hånl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="klukkle"><i>klukkl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="rysje"><i>r</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skrattle"><i>skrattl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="storle"><i>storl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="innsjå">          <i>inns</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilgodesjå">      <i>tilgodes</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="unnsjå">          <i>unns</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="oversjå">         <i>overs</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="uglesjå">         <i>ugles</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="forsjå">          <i>fors</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="ettersjå">        <i>etters</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="imøtesjå">        <i>imøtes</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomsjå">      <i>gjennoms</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjensjå">         <i>gjens</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="utsjå">           <i>uts</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="føresjå">             <i>føres</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilsjå">          <i>tils</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="sjå til">         <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå fram til">    <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>fram<b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå det an">      <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>det<b/>an</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå an">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>an</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå bort frå">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>bort<b/>frå</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå sitt snitt">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>sitt<b/>snitt</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå etter">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>etter</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå igjen">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>igjen</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå igjennom">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>igjennom</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå på">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>på</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå på som">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>på<b/>som</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå seg om">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>seg<b/>om</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå til">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>til</ig></e>
<e lm="sjå ut over">          <i>s</i><par n="s/jå_no-cp__vblex_adj"/><ig><b/>ut<b/>over</ig></e>
<e lm="tysje"><i>t</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="trysje"><i>tr</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="heimsjå"><i>heims</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="grysje"><i>gr</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="hegrele"><i>hegrel</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="drysje"><i>dr</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="knysje"><i>kn</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="dysje"><i>d</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="avsjå"><i>avs</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="småle"><i>smål</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="flysje"><i>fl</i><par n="r/ysje__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="missjå"><i>miss</i><par n="s/jå__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="skoggerle">	<i>skoggerl</i><par n="l/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
